Utah statutes.
53-11-124.   Penalties.

Any violation of this chapter is a class A misdemeanor, unless the circumstances of the violation amount to an offense subject to a greater criminal penalty under Title 76, Utah Criminal Code.



Enacted by Chapter 257, 1998 General Session

